Montana, session 2025, SB115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 13-15-105, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-15-105. Notices relating to absentee ballot counting board. (1) Not more than 10 days 12
days or less than 2 days before an election, the election administrator shall broadcast on radio or television, as
provided in 2-3-105 through 2-3-107, or publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the county a notice
indicating the method that will be used for counting absentee ballots and the place and time that the absentee
ballots will be counted.
(2) If the count will begin before the polls close, the notice required under subsection (1) must
inform the public that any person observing the procedures of the count is required to take the oath provided in
13-15-207(4) and is subject to 13-35-241."
Section 2. Section 13-17-203, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-17-203. Publication of information concerning voting systems. (1) Not more than 10 12 days
or less than 2 days before an election at which a voting system will be used by voters, the election administrator
shall broadcast on radio or television, as provided in 2-3-105 through 2-3-107, or publish in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county:
(a) a diagram showing the voting system to be used by voters and a sample of the ballot layout (in
newspaper only);
(b) a statement of the locations where voting systems to be used by voters are on public exhibition;
and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 115
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 115
(c) instructions on how to vote.
(2) The election administrator shall select the method of notification that the election administrator
believes is best suited to reach the largest number of potential electors."
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 115
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 115, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 115
INTRODUCED BY W. MCKAMEY, M. YAKAWICH
AN ACT ADJUSTING THE TIMEFRAME FOR PUBLIC NOTICES RELATED TO ELECTIONS; AMENDING
SECTIONS 13-15-105 AND 13-17-203, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”